Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1324
Public improvement; furnishing labor or material; falsifying certificate that equipment has been assessed; violation; penalty.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation falsifying any statement required by section 77-1323 shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 436, § 2, p. 1453;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 223;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 497.